Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2936.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8-8-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-8 entitled "District Court" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
8-8-2. Divisions.
(a) For the distribution of court business, the state is divided into four (4) divisions as
follows:
(1) Second division. The second division consists of the city of Newport and the towns of
Jamestown, Little Compton, Middletown, Portsmouth, and Tiverton. Appeals and transfers in cases
arising in the enumerated cities and towns of the second division shall be transmitted by the clerk
of the Second Division District Court to the clerk of the Newport County Superior Court.
(2) Third division. The third division consists of the city of Warwick and the city of
Cranston and the towns of Coventry, East Greenwich, Foster, Glocester, Johnston, Lincoln, North
Kingstown, North Providence, North Smithfield, Scituate, Smithfield, West Greenwich and West
Warwick. Appeals and transfers in cases arising in the enumerated cities and towns of the third
division shall be transmitted by the clerk of the Third Division District Court to the clerk of the
Kent County Superior Court.
(3) Fourth division. The fourth division consists of the towns of Charlestown, Exeter,
Hopkinton, Narragansett, New Shoreham, North Kingstown, Richmond, South Kingstown, and
Westerly. Appeals and transfers in cases arising in the enumerated cities and towns of the fourth
division shall be transmitted by the clerk of the Fourth Division District Court to the clerk of the

Washington County Superior Court.
(4) Sixth division. The sixth division consists of the cities of Central Falls, East
Providence, Providence, Pawtucket, Woonsocket and the towns of Barrington, Bristol, Burrillville,
Cumberland and Warren. Appeals and transfers in cases arising in the enumerated cities and towns
of the sixth division shall be transmitted by the clerk of the Sixth Division District Court to the
clerk of the Providence County Superior Court.
(b) In each division the place or places for holding court shall be designated by the chief
judge.
(c) The district court shall have a seal for each of its divisions, which shall contain the
words, “District court of the State of Rhode Island, division.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect two (2) months after passage.
========
LC005281
========
LC005281 - Page 2 of 3